Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Revisor’s notes. —

Through administrative reorganization the division of lands is now known as the division of mining, land, and water.

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1984, 1989, 2000, 2010, and 2018 to make other, minor word changes.

Administrative Code. —

For lands regulations, see 11 AAC, part 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The provisions of Title 38 regarding acquisition, management and disposal of state land do not apply to land withdrawn from the state public domain as a state park or recreation area. Title 38 does apply to state forests, except that land in a state forest may not be conveyed to a third party and is subject to limitations on other types of state land disposals.
February 21, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.